Utah statutes.
41-1a-418 (Superseded 10/01/12).   Authorized special group license plates.

(1)  The division shall only issue special group license plates in accordance with this section through Section 41-1a-422 to a person who is specified under this section within the categories listed as follows:

(a)  disability special group license plates issued in accordance with Section 41-1a-420;

(b)  honor special group license plates, as in a war hero, which plates are issued for a:

(i)  survivor of the Japanese attack on Pearl Harbor;

(ii)  former prisoner of war;

(iii)  recipient of a Purple Heart;

(iv)  disabled veteran; or

(v)  recipient of a gold star award issued by the United States Secretary of Defense;

(c)  unique vehicle type special group license plates, as for historical, collectors value, or other unique vehicle type, which plates are issued for:

(i)  a special interest vehicle;

(ii)  a vintage vehicle;

(iii)  a farm truck; or

(iv) (A)  until Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(B) or (5) applies, a vehicle powered by clean fuel as defined in Section 59-13-102; or

(B)  beginning on the effective date of rules made by the Department of Transportation authorized under Subsection 41-6a-702(5)(b) and until Subsection (5) applies, a vehicle powered by clean fuel that meets the standards established by the Department of Transportation in rules authorized under Subsection 41-6a-702(5)(b);

(d)  recognition special group license plates, as in a public official or an emergency service giver, which plates are issued for a:

(i)  current member of the Legislature;

(ii)  current member of the United States Congress;

(iii)  current member of the National Guard;

(iv)  licensed amateur radio operator;

(v)  currently employed, volunteer, or retired firefighter until June 30, 2009;

(vi)  emergency medical technician;

(vii)  current member of a search and rescue team; or

(viii)  current honorary consulate designated by the United States Department of State; and

(e)  support special group license plates, as for a contributor to an institution or cause, which plates are issued for a contributor to:

(i)  an institution's scholastic scholarship fund;

(ii)  the Division of Wildlife Resources;

(iii)  the Department of Veterans' Affairs;

(iv)  the Division of Parks and Recreation;

(v)  the Department of Agriculture and Food;

(vi)  the Guardian Ad Litem Services Account and the Children's Museum of Utah;

(vii)  the Boy Scouts of America;

(viii)  spay and neuter programs through No More Homeless Pets in Utah;

(ix)  the Boys and Girls Clubs of America;

(x)  Utah public education;

(xi)  programs that provide support to organizations that create affordable housing for those in severe need through the Division of Real Estate;

(xii)  the Department of Public Safety;

(xiii)  programs that support Zion National Park;

(xiv)  beginning on July 1, 2009, programs that provide support to firefighter organizations;

(xv)  programs that promote bicycle operation and safety awareness;

(xvi)  programs that conduct or support cancer research;

(xvii)  programs that create or support autism awareness;

(xviii)  programs that create or support humanitarian service and educational and cultural exchanges;

(xix)  programs that conduct or support prostate cancer awareness, screening, detection, or prevention; or

(xx)  programs that support and promote adoptions.

(2) (a) The division may not issue a new type of special group license plate unless the division receives:

(i) (A)  a start-up fee established under Section 63J-1-504 for production and administrative costs for providing the new special group license plates; or

(B)  a legislative appropriation for the start-up fee provided under Subsection (2)(a)(i)(A); and

(ii)  beginning on January 1, 2012, and for the issuance of a support special group license plate authorized in Section 41-1a-422, at least 500 completed applications for the new type of support special group license plate to be issued with all fees required under this part for the support special group license plate issuance paid by each applicant.

(b) (i)  Beginning on January 1, 2012, each participating organization shall collect and hold applications for support special group license plates authorized in Section 41-1a-422 on or after January 1, 2012, until it has received at least 500 applications.

(ii)  Once a participating organization has received at least 500 applications, it shall submit the applications, along with the necessary fees, to the division for the division to begin working on the design and issuance of the new type of support special group license plate to be issued.

(iii)  Beginning on January 1, 2012, the division may not work on the issuance or design of a new support special group license plate authorized in Section 41-1a-422 until the applications and fees required under this Subsection (2) have been received by the division.

(iv)  The division shall begin issuance of a new support special group license plate authorized in Section 41-1a-422 on or after January 1, 2012, no later than six months after receiving the applications and fees required under this Subsection (2).

(c) (i)  Beginning on July 1, 2009, the division may not renew a motor vehicle registration of a motor vehicle that has been issued a firefighter recognition special group license plate unless the applicant is a contributor as defined in Subsection 41-1a-422(1)(a)(ii)(D) to the Firefighter Support Restricted Account.

(ii)  A registered owner of a vehicle that has been issued a firefighter recognition special group license plate prior to July 1, 2009, upon renewal of the owner's motor vehicle registration shall:

(A)  be a contributor to the Firefighter Support Restricted Account as required under Subsection (2)(c)(i); or

(B)  replace the firefighter recognition special group license plate with a new license plate.

(3) (a)  Beginning on July 1, 2011, if a support special group license plate type authorized in Section 41-1a-422 and issued prior to January 1, 2012, has less than 500 license plates issued each year for a three consecutive year time period that begins on July 1, the division may not issue that type of support special group license plate to a new applicant beginning on January 1 of the following calendar year after the three consecutive year period for which that type of support special group license plate has less than 500 license plates issued each year.

(b)  If the division is required to stop the issuance of a type of support special group license plate authorized in Section 41-1a-422 under this Subsection (3), the division shall report to the Transportation Interim Committee that the division will stop the issuance on or before the November interim meeting of the year in which the commission determines to stop the issuance of that type of support special group license plate.

(4) (a)  Beginning on July 1, 2011, if a support special group license plate type authorized in Section 41-1a-422 and issued on or after January 1, 2012, has less than 500 license plates issued each year for a three consecutive year time period that begins on July 1, the division may not issue that type of support special group license plate to a new applicant beginning on January 1 of the following calendar year after the three consecutive year time period for which that type of support special group license plate has less than 500 license plates issued each year.

(b)  If the division is required to stop the issuance of a type of support special group license plate authorized in Section 41-1a-422 under this Subsection (4), the division shall report to the Transportation Interim Committee that the division will stop the issuance on or before the November interim meeting of the year in which the commission determines to stop the issuance of that type of support special group license plate.

(5)  Beginning on July 1, 2011, the division may not issue a unique vehicle type license plate for a vehicle powered by clean fuel under Subsection (1)(c)(iv) to an applicant.

